Nebraska, session 109, LB881.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB881 LB881
2026 2026
Section 1. The Legislature finds and declares that:
(1) Law enforcement agencies or jails entering into agreements with
other agencies to enforce immigration law or to investigate, interrogate,
detain, detect, or arrest persons for immigration enforcement purposes
pursuant to such agreement is a matter of statewide concern; and
(2) The public is entitled to receive notice and have an opportunity
to be heard concerning such agreements.
Sec. 2. For purposes of sections 1 to 5 of this act:
(1) Commission means the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and
Criminal Justice;
(2)(a) Immigration enforcement agreement means an agreement or
memorandum of understanding between a jail, a law enforcement agency, or
the Nebraska State Patrol and any other public entity, pursuant to which
the jail, agency, or patrol will enforce immigration law or investigate,
interrogate, detain, detect, or arrest persons for immigration
enforcement purposes.
(b) Immigration enforcement agreement does not include an agreement
between public entities, including the United States Department of
Homeland Security, relating to investigating violations of laws
prohibiting human trafficking or enforcing such laws;
(3) Jail includes a city or county jail;
(4) Law enforcement agency means a police department, a town
marshal, or the office of sheriff, but does not include the Nebraska
State Patrol;
(5) Local governing body means the governing body of a political
subdivision that oversees a law enforcement agency or jail;
(6) Meeting has the same meaning as in section 84-1409; and
(7) Public entity means the United States, any state, county, or
municipality, and any branch, subdivision, board, commission, department,
agency, or other instrumentality of such entities.
Sec. 3. (1)(a) Beginning July 1, 2026, a law enforcement agency or
-2-

LB881 LB881
2026 2026
jail shall not enter into an immigration enforcement agreement without
first notifying the appropriate local governing body and receiving
approval as provided in this section.
(b) The law enforcement agency or jail shall provide written notice
to the local governing body pertaining to the proposed agreement. The
notice shall be provided at least thirty days before the agreement would
go into effect.
(2) If a law enforcement agency or jail entered into an immigration
enforcement agreement prior to July 1, 2026, the agreement shall
automatically terminate on December 1, 2026, and thereafter be void and
unenforceable, unless:
(a) On or before October 15, 2026, the agency or jail provides
written notice to the appropriate local governing body pertaining to such
agreement; and
(b) The local governing body approves the agreement as provided in
this section.
(3)(a) When a local governing body receives a notice under this
section, the local governing body shall include the notice in the agenda
of subjects of the next regularly scheduled public meeting of the local
governing body at which the public has the right to attend and speak.
(b) Following such hearing, the local governing body may approve or
disapprove the immigration enforcement agreement.
(c) If the local governing body approves the agreement following a
public meeting conducted in compliance with the Open Meetings Act, the
law enforcement agency or jail may enter into such agreement. If the
local governing body does not approve the agreement or this section is
otherwise not complied with, the law enforcement agency or jail shall not
enter into the agreement.
(4) Any immigration enforcement agreement entered into in violation
of this section is void and unenforceable.
(5) Within sixty days after entering into an immigration enforcement
-3-

LB881 LB881
2026 2026
agreement as provided for in this section, a law enforcement agency or
jail shall provide the following information to the commission:
(a) A written copy of any such agreement;
(b) A written copy of the notice delivered under subsection (1) or
(2) of this section; and
(c) A written copy of minutes of any public meeting pertaining to
the agreement as provided in section 84-1413.
Sec. 4. (1)(a) Beginning July 1, 2026, the Nebraska State Patrol
shall not enter into an immigration enforcement agreement without first
notifying the commission and receiving approval as provided in this
section.
(b) The patrol shall provide written notice to the commission
pertaining to the proposed agreement. The notice shall be provided at
least thirty days before the agreement would go into effect.
(2)(a) If the patrol entered into an immigration enforcement
agreement prior to July 1, 2026, the agreement shall automatically
terminate on December 1, 2026, and thereafter be void and unenforceable,
unless:
(a) On or before October 15, 2026, the patrol provides written
notice to the commission pertaining to such agreement; and
(b) The commission approves the agreement as provided in this
section.
(3)(a) When the commission receives a notice under this section, the
commission shall include the notice in the agenda of subjects of the next
regularly scheduled public meeting of the commission at which the public
has the right to attend and speak.
(b) Following such hearing, the commission may approve or disapprove
the immigration enforcement agreement.
(c) If the commission approves the agreement following a public
meeting conducted in compliance with the Open Meetings Act, the patrol
may enter into such agreement. If the commission does not approve the
-4-

LB881 LB881
2026 2026
agreement or this section is otherwise not complied with, the patrol
shall not enter into the agreement.
(4) Any immigration enforcement agreement entered into in violation
of this section is void and unenforceable.
(5) Within sixty days after entering into an immigration enforcement
agreement as provided for in this section, the patrol shall provide the
commission with a written copy of such agreement.
Sec. 5. A violation of section 3 or 4 of this act shall be
considered a violation of the Open Meetings Act. Any resident of this
state may file a civil action in district court as provided in section
84-1414 for the purpose of requiring compliance with or preventing
violations of such sections.
-5-